Utah statutes.
4-24-19.   Livestock markets -- Records to be maintained -- Retention of records -- Schedule of fees and charges to be posted.

(1) Each owner or operator of a livestock market shall keep a record of:

(a)  the date each consignment of livestock is received for sale together with the number of each type of livestock within such consignment;

(b)  the name and address of each buyer;

(c)  the date of sale and the number and species of livestock purchased by each buyer; and

(d)  the brand or mark appearing on each animal at the time of sale to the buyer.

(2)  The records mandated by this section shall be retained for a period of two years from the date on which the livestock market sold the livestock.

(3)  A schedule of all fees and commission rates charged by the livestock market shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises of each market.

(4)  A statement of the gross sales price, commission, and other fees charged for the sale of each consignment shall be available for inspection by the department, and a copy furnished the owner or consignor of the livestock.

